Utah statutes.
31A-35-301.   The commissioner's authority.
(1)  The commissioner shall:
(a)  make rules as necessary for the administration of this chapter;
(b)  with information as provided by the board, issue or deny licensure under
this chapter;
(c)  take action regarding a license, including suspension or revocation; and
(d)  maintain and publish a current list of licensed bail bond surety
companies and producers.
(2)  The commissioner may establish fees for the issuance, renewal, and
reinstatement of a bail bond surety company license in accordance with Section
63J-1-504.
